Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2008.02
Inheritance tax; estates for life and remainder; tax payable from corpus of estate without apportionment.

In cases where a trust is created or other provisions made whereby any person is given an interest in income or an estate for years, or for life, or other temporary or contingent interest in any property or fund, the tax on both such temporary or contingent interest and on the remainder thereafter shall be charged against and be paid out of the corpus of such property or fund without apportionment between remainders and temporary or contingent estates, and any refund of taxes paid out of corpus shall again become a part of the corpus of such property or fund.

Laws 1953, c. 282, § 5, p. 916.

Under terms of will, inheritance tax on devise of life estate was payable out of residue. Stuckey v. Rosenberg, 169 Neb. 557, 100 N.W.2d 526 (1960).